Utah statutes.
41-6a-1308.   School bus idling standards.
The State Board of Education shall, in consultation with local school
districts and the Air Quality Board:
(1)  implement an idling reduction program for all school bus drivers in the
state; and
(2)  adopt idling reduction standards in the Utah Standards for Utah School
Buses and Operations, 2008 edition.
